Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is  appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $25,612,305.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$184,965,549 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses for operations, from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscel-
laneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in this section, collected or received by the  Housing and Community Services De-
partment.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$16,007,282 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to  the Housing and Community Services Department for lottery
bonds.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$129,920,182 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal  funds other than those described in sections 2 and 6 of this
2017 Act collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 5. There is  appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,426,282
for debt service for bond-related activities.
SECTION 6.
For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, expenditures by the Housing and
Community Services Department for the following are not limited:
(1) Payments for  costs resulting from the sale and issuance or redemption of bonds is-
sued under ORS 287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650 (2005 Edition).
(2) Payment of debt service and redemption premium on  bonds issued under ORS
287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650 (2005 Edition) and payments for  the purchase of bonds
as provided in ORS 456.680.
(3) Loans and payments for  purchasing, insuring and servicing loans as provided in ORS
456.625, 456.627, 456.635, 456.690, 456.705, 456.715 and 456.717  and payments for the purchase
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 1
from lending institutions of securities backed  by residential loans as provided in ORS 456.635
(1).
(4) Advances for development costs made in accordance with ORS 456.710.
(5) Pass-through payments  of federal rent subsidy moneys from the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development.
(6) Payments for costs associated with asset protection.
SECTION 7.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 2